Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Article 9 Information About Donor

15-8.1-901.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Identifying information” means:

The full name of a donor;

The date of birth of the donor; and

The permanent and, if different, current address of the donor at the time of the donation.

“Medical history” means information regarding any of the following:

Present illness of a donor;

Past illness of the donor; and

Social, genetic, and family history pertaining to the health of the donor.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-902.
Applicability.

This article applies only to gametes collected on or after the effective date of this act [January 1, 2021].

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-903.
Collection of information about donor.

A gamete bank or fertility clinic licensed in this state shall collect from a donor the donor’s identifying information and medical history at the time of the donation.

A gamete bank or fertility clinic licensed in this state which receives gametes of a donor collected by another gamete bank or fertility clinic shall collect the name, address, telephone number, and electronic mail address of the gamete bank or fertility clinic from which it received the gametes.

A gamete bank or fertility clinic licensed in this state shall disclose the information collected under subsections (a) and (b) of this section as provided under §

15-8.1-905

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-904.
Declaration regarding identity disclosure.

A gamete bank or fertility clinic licensed in this state which collects gametes from a donor shall:

Provide the donor with information in a record about the donor’s choice regarding identity disclosure; and

Obtain a declaration from the donor regarding identity disclosure.

A gamete bank or fertility clinic licensed in this state shall give a donor the choice to sign a notarized declaration that either:

States that the donor agrees to disclose the donor’s identity to a child conceived by assisted reproduction with the donor’s gametes on request once the child attains eighteen (18) years of age; or

States that the donor does not agree presently to disclose the donor’s identity to the child.

A gamete bank or fertility clinic licensed in this state shall permit a donor who has signed a declaration under subsection (b)(2) of this section, to withdraw the declaration at any time by signing a declaration under subsection (b)(1) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-905.
Disclosure of identifying information and medical history.

On request of a child conceived by assisted reproduction who attains eighteen (18) years of age, a gamete bank or fertility clinic licensed in this state which collected the gametes used in the assisted reproduction shall make a good-faith effort to provide the child with identifying information of the donor who provided the gametes, unless the donor signed and did not withdraw a declaration under §

15-8.1-904(b)(2)

. If the donor signed and did not withdraw the declaration, the gamete bank or fertility clinic shall make a good-faith effort to notify the donor, who may elect under §

15-8.1-904(c)

to withdraw the donor’s declaration.

Regardless, whether a donor signed a declaration under §

15-8.1-904(b)(2)

, on request by a child conceived by assisted reproduction who attains eighteen (18) years of age, or, if the child is a minor, by a parent or guardian of the child, a gamete bank or fertility clinic licensed in this state which collected the gametes used in the assisted reproduction shall make a good-faith effort to provide the child or, if the child is a minor, the parent or guardian of the child, access to nonidentifying medical history of the donor.

On request of a child conceived by assisted reproduction who attains eighteen (18) years of age, a gamete bank or fertility clinic licensed in this state which received the gametes used in the assisted reproduction from another gamete bank or fertility clinic shall disclose the name, address, telephone number, and electronic mail address of the gamete bank or fertility clinic from which it received the gametes.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-906.
Recordkeeping.

A gamete bank or fertility clinic licensed in this state which collects gametes for use in assisted reproduction shall maintain identifying information and medical history about each gamete donor. The gamete bank or fertility clinic shall maintain records of gamete screening and testing and comply with reporting requirements, in accordance with federal law and applicable law of this state other than this article.

A gamete bank or fertility clinic licensed in this state that receives gametes from another gamete bank or fertility clinic shall maintain the name, address, telephone number, and electronic mail address of the gamete bank or fertility clinic from which it received the gametes.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.